Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1985
Minimum capital and surplus requirements.

Before being authorized to transact the business of title insurance in this state, a title insurer shall establish and maintain a minimum paid-in capital of not less than one million dollars and, in addition, paid-in initial surplus of at least one million dollars.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 8.